Hawaii statutes.
§412:2-315 National or state emergencies. (a)
The emergency powers granted in this section may be invoked for the purpose of
protecting the general public during any national or state emergency by
assuring that Hawaii financial institutions subject to regulation by the
commissioner can operate in a safe and effective manner.

(b) If the President of the United States
declares a national emergency, by proclamation or otherwise, the commissioner
may order some or all Hawaii financial institutions in the State to comply with
any regulations, limitations or restrictions prescribed by the Secretary of the
Treasury, the Comptroller of the Currency, the Federal Reserve Board, or other
federal agency that would otherwise be applicable only to a federal financial
institution.

(c) If the governor declares a state
emergency, by proclamation or otherwise, the commissioner may order some or all
Hawaii financial institutions in the State to observe such temporary rules,
limitations or restrictions as the commissioner may prescribe in order to cope
with such emergency.

(d) The commissioner may assess and collect
from all affected Hawaii financial institutions their ratable share of the
administrative costs incurred by the division in its administration of any
emergency orders issued under this section. Administrative costs assessed
under this section shall be deposited into the compliance resolution fund
established under section 26-9(o). The determination of the commissioner of
which Hawaii financial institution or institutions are "affected" and
the proration method the commissioner chooses to employ in making assessments
under this section may be appealed to the circuit court as provided in chapter
91 by any Hawaii financial institution aggrieved thereby. [L 1993, c 350, pt of
§1; am L 1996, c 207, §3; am L 1999, c 129, §9]

Rules of Court

Appeals, see HRCP rule 72.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next